Nevada, session 83, AB595.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 218D.415 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
218D.415 1. The summary of each bill or joint resolution
introduced in the Legislature must include the statement:
(a) “Fiscal Note: Effect on Local Government: May have Fiscal
Impact,”
“Fiscal Note: Effect on Local Government: No,” or
“Fiscal Note: Effect on Local Government: Increases or
Newly Provides for Term of Imprisonment in County or
City Jail or Detention Facility,”
 whichever is appropriate; and
(b) “Effect on the State: Yes,”
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
“Effect on the State: No,”
“Effect on the State: Contains Appropriation included in
Executive Budget,”
“Effect on the State: Executive Budget,” or
“Effect on the State: Contains Appropriation not included in
Executive Budget,”
 whichever is appropriate.
2. The Legislative Counsel shall consult the Fiscal Analysis
Division to secure the appropriate information for summaries of
bills and joint resolutions.
3. If an amendment adds an appropriation to a bill that
previously did not include an appropriation or removes all
appropriations from a bill that previously included one or more
appropriations, the Legislative Counsel shall change the summary of
the bill to reflect the inclusion or removal.
4. For the purposes of this section, the “Executive Budget” is
the proposed budget that, pursuant to NRS 353.230, the Governor
submits to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Legislature.
Sec. 2. NRS 218D.430 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218D.430 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4,
the Fiscal Analysis Division shall obtain a fiscal note on:
(a) Any bill or joint resolution which creates or increases any
fiscal liability or decreases any revenue which appears to be in
excess of $2,000; and
(b) Any bill or joint resolution which increases or newly
provides for a term of imprisonment in the state prison or makes
release on parole or probation from the state prison less likely,
 before a vote is taken on such a bill or joint resolution by a
committee of the Assembly or the Senate.
2. The fiscal note must contain a reliable estimate of the
anticipated change in appropriation authority, fiscal liability or state
revenue under the bill or joint resolution, including, to the extent
possible, a projection of such changes in future biennia.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 218D.400 to
218D.495, inclusive, or a joint rule, the estimates must be made by
the affected agency or agencies.
4. The fiscal note is not required on any bill or joint resolution
relating exclusively to the proposed executive budget. For the
purposes of this subsection, the “proposed executive budget” is the
proposed budget that, pursuant to NRS 353.230, the Governor
submits to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Legislature.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)